th: ประเภทของซับหลังตกแต่งหน้าต่าง: ซับในกันแสง 100%; ซับในประหยัดพลังงาน; แบบปลอกสอดราว; ซับในช่วยลดแสง; ซับในผ้าโปร่ง; ซับในกันเสียง; ซับในมาตรฐาน; ซับในกันความร้อน; ไม่มีแผ่นรอง; อื่นๆ
en: Window treatment lining type: Blackout lining; Energy-saving lining; Interlined; Room-darkening lining; Sheer lining; Soundproof lining; Standard lining; Thermal lining; Unlined; Other
pl: Typ podszycia tkaniny okiennej: Podszewka zaciemniająca; Podszewka energooszczędna; Z podszewką; Podszewka przyciemniająca; Podszewka transparentna; Podszewka wygłuszająca; Podszewka standardowa; Podszewka termiczna; Bez podszewki; Inne
pt-BR: Tipo de forro de janela: Forro blackout; Forro com economia de energia; Entretelado; Forro redutor de luminosidade; Forro translúcido; Forro com isolamento acústico; Forro padrão; Forro térmico; Sem forro; Outro
el: Τύπος επένδυσης διακοσμητικού παραθύρου: Επένδυση συσκότισης; Επένδυση εξοικονόμησης ενέργειας; Με ενδιάμεση φόδρα; Επένδυση που σκουραίνει το δωμάτιο; Διαφανής επένδυση; Ηχομονωτική επένδυση; Τυπική επένδυση; Θερμική επένδυση; Χωρίς φόδρα; Άλλο
zh-CN: 窗饰衬里类型: 遮光衬里; 节能衬里; 加衬; 半遮光衬里; 薄纱里衬; 隔音衬里; 标准衬里; 保暖衬里; 无衬; 其他
da: Foringstype til vinduesbehandling: Mørklægningsforing; Energibesparende foring; Interlined; Foring med let mørklægning; Transparent foring; Lydisolerende foring; Standardforing; Termisk foring; Unlined; Andet
cs: Typ podšívky okenní dekorace: Blackout podšívka; Termoizolační podšívka; S podšívkou; Zatemňovací podšívka; Průsvitná podšívka; Zvukotěsná podšívka; Standardní podšívka; Tepelná podšívka; Bez podšívky; Jiné
sl-SI: Vrsta podloge za okrasne zavese: Zatemnitvena podloga; Energijsko varčna obloga; Medvrstno; Zatemnitvena obloga; Prozorna podloga; Zvočno izolirana obloga; Standardna podloga; Termična podloga; Brez podloge; Druga
es: Tipo de forro del tratamiento para ventana: Forro opaco; Revestimiento para ahorrar energía; Intercalado; Revestimiento que oscurece la habitación; Forro transparente; Revestimiento insonorizado; Forro estándar; Forro térmico; Sin forro; Otros
lt-LT: Langų uždangos pamušalo tipas: Užtemdantis pamušalas; Energiją taupantis pamušalas; Su pamušalu; Tamsinantis pamušalas; Permatomas pamušalas; Garsą izoliuojantis pamušalas; Standartinis pamušalas; Terminis pamušalas; Be linijų; Kita
sv: Fönsterbehandlingsfodertyp: Mörkläggningsfoder; Energibesparande foder; Fodrad; Rumsförmörkande foder; Transparent foder; Ljudisolerande foder; Standardfoder; Termiskt foder; Utan innerförsegling; Annat
pt-PT: Tipo de forro do tratamento da janela: Forro blackout; Forro economizador de energia; Forro interno; Forro que bloqueia a luz; Forro transparente; Forro à prova de som; Forro padrão; Forro térmico; Sem forro; Outro
vi: Loại lớp lót trang trí cửa sổ: Lớp lót chống xuyên sáng; Lớp lót tiết kiệm năng lượng; Có lớp lót bên trong; Lớp lót làm tối phòng; Lớp lót xuyên thấu; Lớp lót cách âm; Lớp lót tiêu chuẩn; Lớp lót cách nhiệt; Không có lớp lót bên trong; Khác
bg-BG: Тип подплата на текстил за прозорец: Напълно затъмняваща подплата; Енергоспестяваща подплата; Подплатено; Затъмняваща стаята подплата; Прозрачна подплата; Звукоизолираща подплата; Стандартна подплата; Топлинна подплата; Без подплата; Друго
it: Tipo di rivestimento per finestre: Fodera oscurante; Rivestimento a risparmio energetico; Foderato; Rivestimento oscurante; Fodera trasparente; Rivestimento insonorizzante; Fodera standard; Fodera termica; Senza rivestimento; Altro
fr: Type de doublure pour habillage de fenêtre: Doublure occultante; Doublure écoénergétique; Doublé; Doublure occultante; Doublure transparente; Doublure insonorisant; Doublure standard; Doublure thermique; Sans revêtement; Autre
sk-SK: Typ podšívky okenných záclon: Zatemňovacia podšívka; Energeticky úsporná podšívka; Všité pod podšívku; Zatemňovacia podšívka; Priehľadná podšívka; Zvukotesná podšívka; Štandardná podšívka; Tepelná podšívka; Bez podšitia; Iné
hr-HR: Vrsta obloge za prozorske ukrase: Podstava za blokiranje svjetlosti; Podstava za uštedu energije; Međusloj; Podstava za zamračivanje sobe; Prozirna podstava; Podstava za zvučnu izolaciju; Standardna podstava; Termalna podstava; Bez linija; Ostalo
zh-TW: 窗飾襯裡類型: 全遮光內襯; 節能內襯; 有內襯; 半遮光內襯; 透明內襯; 隔音內襯; 標準內襯; 隔熱內襯; 無內襯; 其他
de: Futtertyp der Fensterdrapierung: Verdunkelungsfutter; Energiesparende Auskleidung; Mit Zwischenschicht; Abdunkelungsfutter; Durchsichtiges Futter; Schalldämmende Auskleidung; Standardfutter; Thermofutter; Nicht ausgekleidet; Sonstiges
hu: Ablakkezelés bélés típusa: Sötétítő bélés; Energiatakarékos bélés; Köztes bélés; Sötétítő bélés; Áttetsző bélés; Hangszigetelő bélés; Standard bélés; Termikus bélés; Béleletlen; Egyéb
ro-RO: Tipul de acoperire a tratamentului de geam: Căptușeală opacă; Căptușeală economică; Căptușeală dublă; Căptușeală de întunecare a camerei; Căptușeală transparentă; Căptușeală fonoabsorbantă; Căptușeală standard; Căptușeală termică; Necăptușit; Altele
ko: 창문 장식 안감 유형: 암막 안감; 에너지 절약형 안감; 중간 안감; 룸 다크닝 안감; 비침 안감; 방음 안감; 표준 안감; 단열 안감; 라이너 없음; 기타
tr: Pencere perde astar tipi: Karartma astarı; Enerji tasarruflu astar; Ara dolgulu; Odayı karartıcı astar; Tül astar; Ses yalıtımlı astar; Standart astar; Isı yalıtımlı astar; Astarsız; Diğer
fi: Ikkunaverhouksen vuorityyppi: Pimennysvuoraus; Energiaa säästävä vuoraus; Välivuori; Huonetta pimentävä vuoraus; Läpikuultava vuoraus; Äänieristysvuoraus; Standardivuoraus; Lämpövuoraus; Vuoraamaton; Muu
nb: Type foring til vindusbehandling: Mørkleggingsfôr; Energisparende fôr; Mellomlinjet; Rommørkende fôr; Gjennomsiktig fôr; Lydisolerende fôr; Standardfôr; Termofôr; Unlined; Annet
ja: ウィンドウトリートメントの裏地タイプ: 遮光裏地; 省エネ裏地; 芯地付き; 室内社交裏地; シースルー裏地; 防音裏地; 標準裏地; 保温裏地; 裏地なし; その他
ru: Тип подкладки оконного декора: Светонепроницаемая подкладка; Энергосберегающая подкладка; С дополнительной подкладкой; Затемняющая подкладка; Прозрачная подкладка; Звукоизолирующая подкладка; Стандартная подкладка; Термоизоляционная подкладка; Без подкладки; Другое
nl: Type voering van de raambekleding: Verduisterende voering; Energiebesparende voering; Tussenvoering; Verduisterende voering; Transparante voering; Geluidsisolerende voering; Standaard voering; Thermische voering; Ongevoerd; Overig